Missouri, session 2026, SB1032.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.161, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.161,
to read as follows:
143.161. 1. For all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 1997, a resident may deduct one thousand two
hundred dollars for each dependent for whom such resident is
entitled to a dependency exemption deduction for federal
income tax purposes, provided that the exemption amount as
defined under 26 U.S.C. Section 151 is not zero. In the
case of a dependent who has attained sixty-five years of age
on or before the last day of the taxable year, if such
dependent resides in the taxpayer's home or the dependent's
own home or if such dependent does not receive Medicaid or
state funding while residing in a facility licensed pursuant
to chapter 198, the taxpayer may deduct an additional one
thousand dollars.
2. For all taxable years beginning on or after January
1, 1999, a resident who qualifies as an unmarried head of
household or as a surviving spouse for federal income tax
purposes may deduct an additional one thousand four hundred
dollars.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or after January
1, 2015, for each birth for which a certificate of birth
resulting in stillbirth has been issued under section


193.165, a taxpayer may claim the exemption under subsection
1 of this section only in the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred, if the child otherwise would have been
a member of the taxpayer's household.
4. (1) In addition to the exemptions provided for
pursuant to subsections 1 to 3 of this section, for all tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer may
deduct two thousand four hundred dollars for each child to
which a taxpayer gives birth during the tax year and for
which the taxpayer is entitled to a dependency exemption for
federal income tax purposes, regardless of whether the
exemption amount as defined under 26 U.S.C. Section 151 is
zero.
(2) A deduction authorized pursuant to this subsection
shall only be made for the tax year in which the taxpayer
gives birth to a child for which the taxpayer is entitled to
the deduction provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection
and shall only be made for the child to which the taxpayer
gives birth during the tax year.
(3) A taxpayer shall not be eligible to claim a
deduction pursuant to this subsection and subsection 1 or 3
of this section for the same child.